New York, session 2025-2026, S6010.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The economic development law is amended by adding a new 2 section 131-a to read as follows: 3 § 131-a. Definition of a microbusiness. For the purposes of this chap- 4 ter, a microbusiness shall be deemed to be a business that is resident 5 in this state, independently owned and operated, not dominant in its 6 field and employs under five persons. 7 § 2. Paragraphs (h) and (h) of subdivision 11 of section 213 of the 8 state finance law, paragraph (h) as added by section 1 of part BB of 9 chapter 58 of the laws of 2022, and paragraph (h) as added by chapter 10 587 of the laws of 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (j) is added to 11 read as follows: 12 (h) a community development financial institution[.]; or 13 [(h)](i) any certified service-disabled veteran-owned business enter- 14 prises seeking financing necessary to carry out a procurement contract 15 with an agency or authority or other entity of the state or federal 16 government[.]; or 17 (j) a microbusiness, as defined by section one hundred thirty-one-a of 18 the economic development law, that has been in operation for five years 19 and that is located in an empire zone, empowerment zone, a highly 20 distressed area or renewal community. 21 § 3. Section 16-t of section 1 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1968, 22 constituting the urban development corporation act is amended by adding 23 a new subdivision 17 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09398-01-5 S. 6010 2 1 17. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the 2 corporation shall provide at least five million dollars in program funds 3 pursuant to this section to lending organizations for the purpose of 4 making micro-loans to microbusinesses, as defined by section one hundred 5 thirty-one-a of the economic development law. Microbusinesses shall be 6 eligible to apply for funding in the same manner as other small busi- 7 nesses pursuant to subdivision three of this section. 8 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.